District of Columbia statutes.
49-1101.16

Member states, effective date, and amendment.

(a)

Any state is eligible to become a member state.

(b)

The compact shall become effective and binding upon legislative enactment of the compact into law by no fewer than 10 states. The effective date shall be no earlier than December 1, 2007. After December 1, 2007, it shall become effective and binding as to any other member state upon enactment of the compact into law by that state. The governors of non-member states or their designees shall be invited to participate in the activities of the Interstate Commission on a nonvoting basis prior to adoption of the compact by all states.

(c)

The Interstate Commission may propose amendments to the compact for enactment by the member states. No amendment shall become effective and binding upon the Interstate Commission and the member states unless and until it is enacted into law by unanimous consent of the member states.

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-304, § 17, 60 DCR 2717
The Interstate Compact on Educational Opportunity for Military Children was formally adopted by 10 states in August 2008.